Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1579
Discovery of property of debtor; proceedings; fees; taxation as costs.

The judge shall allow to sheriffs, referees, receivers, and witnesses such compensation as is allowed for like service in other cases, to be taxed as costs in the case, and shall enforce by order the collection thereof from such party or parties as ought to pay the same.

R.S.1867, Code § 548, p. 489;

R.S.1913, § 8127;

C.S.1922, § 9063;

C.S.1929, § 20-1581;

R.S.1943, § 25-1579;

Laws 1959, c. 140, § 2, p. 546.